sk_SK-lemma/sk_SK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2711 N 1
SFX 2711 ôž ožu .
SFX 2712 N 1
SFX 2712 ôž oži .
SFX 2713 N 1
SFX 2713 ôž ožom .
SFX 2714 N 1
SFX 2714 ôž ože .
SFX 2715 N 1
SFX 2715 ôž ožov .
SFX 2716 N 1
SFX 2716 ôž ožoch .
SFX 2717 N 1
SFX 2717 ôž ožmi .
SFX 2718 N 1
SFX 2718 ec cou .
SFX 2719 N 1
SFX 2719 ec cí .
SFX 2720 N 1
SFX 2720 ec ciam .
SFX 2721 N 1
SFX 2721 ec ciach .
SFX 2722 N 1
SFX 2722 ot tu .
SFX 2723 N 1
SFX 2723 ot te .
SFX 2724 N 1
SFX 2724 ot tom .
SFX 2725 N 1
SFX 2725 ot ty .
SFX 2726 N 1
SFX 2726 ot tov .
SFX 2727 N 1
SFX 2727 ot toch .
SFX 2728 N 1
SFX 2728 ot tami .
SFX 2729 N 1
SFX 2729 lka ĺk .
SFX 2730 N 1
SFX 2730 ko či .
SFX 2731 N 1
SFX 2731 ko čí .
SFX 2732 N 1
SFX 2732 ko čú .
SFX 2733 Y 1
SFX 2733 o 0 .
PFX 2733 Y 1
PFX 2733 o ô .
SFX 2734 N 1
SFX 2734 ko čiam .
SFX 2735 N 1
SFX 2735 ko čiach .
SFX 2736 N 1
SFX 2736 ko čami .
SFX 2737 N 1
SFX 2737 elo iel .
SFX 2738 Y 1
SFX 2738 ť m .
PFX 2738 Y 1
PFX 2738 om ome .
SFX 2739 Y 1
SFX 2739 ť š .
PFX 2739 Y 1
PFX 2739 om ome .
SFX 2740 Y 1
SFX 2740 ť 0 .
PFX 2740 Y 1
PFX 2740 om ome .
SFX 2741 Y 1
SFX 2741 ť me .
PFX 2741 Y 1
PFX 2741 om ome .
SFX 2742 Y 1
SFX 2742 ť te .
PFX 2742 Y 1
PFX 2742 om ome .
SFX 2743 Y 1
SFX 2743 n 0 .
PFX 2743 Y 1
PFX 2743 0 jeh .
SFX 2744 N 1
SFX 2744 n eho .
SFX 2745 Y 1
SFX 2745 n 0 .
PFX 2745 Y 1
PFX 2745 0 h .
SFX 2746 N 1
SFX 2746 on jemu .
SFX 2747 Y 1
SFX 2747 0 emu .
PFX 2747 Y 1
PFX 2747 o 0 .
SFX 2748 N 1
SFX 2748 on mu .
SFX 2749 Y 1
SFX 2749 n m .
PFX 2749 Y 1
PFX 2749 0 ň .
SFX 2750 Y 1
SFX 2750 0 ím .
PFX 2750 Y 1
PFX 2750 o 0 .
SFX 2751 N 1
SFX 2751 on ich .
SFX 2752 Y 1
SFX 2752 0 ich .
PFX 2752 Y 1
PFX 2752 o 0 .
SFX 2753 N 1
SFX 2753 on im .
SFX 2754 Y 1
SFX 2754 0 im .
PFX 2754 Y 1
PFX 2754 o 0 .
SFX 2755 Y 1
SFX 2755 0 imi .
PFX 2755 Y 1
PFX 2755 o 0 .
SFX 2756 Y 1
SFX 2756 0 e .
PFX 2756 Y 1
PFX 2756 o 0 .
SFX 2757 N 1
SFX 2757 ona jej .
SFX 2758 Y 1
SFX 2758 a ej .
PFX 2758 Y 1
PFX 2758 o 0 .
SFX 2759 N 1
SFX 2759 ona ju .
SFX 2760 N 1
SFX 2760 ona ňu .
SFX 2761 Y 1
SFX 2761 na u .
PFX 2761 Y 1
PFX 2761 0 ň .
SFX 2762 N 1
SFX 2762 ona ich .
SFX 2763 Y 1
SFX 2763 a ich .
PFX 2763 Y 1
PFX 2763 o 0 .
SFX 2764 N 1
SFX 2764 ona im .
SFX 2765 Y 1
SFX 2765 a im .
PFX 2765 Y 1
PFX 2765 o 0 .
SFX 2766 Y 1
SFX 2766 a e .
PFX 2766 Y 1
PFX 2766 o 0 .
SFX 2767 Y 1
SFX 2767 a imi .
PFX 2767 Y 1
PFX 2767 o 0 .
SFX 2768 N 1
SFX 2768 en ého .
SFX 2769 N 1
SFX 2769 en ému .
SFX 2770 N 1
SFX 2770 en é .
SFX 2771 N 1
SFX 2771 en á .
SFX 2772 N 1
SFX 2772 n j .
SFX 2773 N 1
SFX 2773 en ú .
SFX 2774 N 1
SFX 2774 en ou .
SFX 2775 N 1
SFX 2775 en o .
SFX 2776 Y 1
SFX 2776 no 0 .
PFX 2776 Y 1
PFX 2776 0 jeh .
SFX 2777 N 1
SFX 2777 no eho .
SFX 2778 Y 1
SFX 2778 no 0 .
PFX 2778 Y 1
PFX 2778 0 h .
SFX 2779 N 1
SFX 2779 ono jemu .
SFX 2780 Y 1
SFX 2780 o emu .
PFX 2780 Y 1
PFX 2780 o 0 .
SFX 2781 N 1
SFX 2781 ono mu .
SFX 2782 Y 1
SFX 2782 no m .
PFX 2782 Y 1
PFX 2782 0 ň .
SFX 2783 Y 1
SFX 2783 o ím .
PFX 2783 Y 1
PFX 2783 o 0 .
SFX 2784 N 1
SFX 2784 ono ich .
SFX 2785 Y 1
SFX 2785 o ich .
PFX 2785 Y 1
PFX 2785 o 0 .
SFX 2786 N 1
SFX 2786 ono im .
SFX 2787 Y 1
SFX 2787 o im .
PFX 2787 Y 1
PFX 2787 o 0 .
SFX 2788 Y 1
SFX 2788 o e .
PFX 2788 Y 1
PFX 2788 o 0 .
SFX 2789 Y 1
SFX 2789 o imi .
PFX 2789 Y 1
PFX 2789 o 0 .
SFX 2790 N 1
SFX 2790 uca úc .
SFX 2791 N 1
SFX 2791 ô é .
SFX 2792 N 1
SFX 2792 ô ých .
SFX 2793 N 1
SFX 2793 ô ým .
SFX 2794 N 1
SFX 2794 ô ými .
SFX 2795 N 1
SFX 2795 ô oho .
SFX 2796 N 1
SFX 2796 ô omu .
SFX 2797 N 1
SFX 2797 ô om .
SFX 2798 N 1
SFX 2798 ý ô .
SFX 2799 N 1
SFX 2799 acha ách .
SFX 2800 Y 1
SFX 2800 a 0 .
PFX 2800 Y 1
PFX 2800 o ô .
SFX 2801 Y 1
SFX 2801 em mich .
PFX 2801 Y 1
PFX 2801 o ô .
SFX 2802 Y 1
SFX 2802 em mim .
PFX 2802 Y 1
PFX 2802 o ô .
SFX 2803 Y 1
SFX 2803 em mimi .
PFX 2803 Y 1
PFX 2803 o ô .
SFX 2804 Y 1
SFX 2804 em mi .
PFX 2804 Y 1
PFX 2804 o ô .
SFX 2805 N 1
SFX 2805 ľa lenciam .
SFX 2806 N 1
SFX 2806 uby úb .
SFX 2807 N 1
SFX 2807 ca iec .
SFX 2808 N 1
SFX 2808 os sa .
SFX 2809 N 1
SFX 2809 os su .
SFX 2810 N 1
SFX 2810 os se .
SFX 2811 N 1
SFX 2811 os som .
SFX 2812 N 1
SFX 2812 os sy .
SFX 2813 N 1
SFX 2813 os sov .
SFX 2814 N 1
SFX 2814 os soch .
SFX 2815 N 1
SFX 2815 os sami .
SFX 2816 N 1
SFX 2816 ista íst .
SFX 2817 N 1
SFX 2817 ok ci .
SFX 2818 Y 1
SFX 2818 a 0 .
PFX 2818 Y 1
PFX 2818 pa pá .
SFX 2819 N 1
SFX 2819 ti ťami .
SFX 2820 N 1
SFX 2820 í eho .
SFX 2821 N 1
SFX 2821 í emu .
SFX 2822 N 1
SFX 2822 í e .
SFX 2823 N 1
SFX 2823 í a .
SFX 2824 N 1
SFX 2824 í u .
SFX 2825 Y 1
SFX 2825 a 0 .
PFX 2825 Y 1
PFX 2825 p pi .
SFX 2826 Y 1
SFX 2826 kne rajšie .
PFX 2826 Y 1
PFX 2826 p 0 .
SFX 2827 Y 1
SFX 2827 kne ajkrajšie .
PFX 2827 Y 1
PFX 2827 p 0 .
SFX 2828 Y 1
SFX 2828 ný rajší .
PFX 2828 Y 1
PFX 2828 pe 0 .
SFX 2829 Y 1
SFX 2829 kný rajšieho .
PFX 2829 Y 1
PFX 2829 p 0 .
SFX 2830 Y 1
SFX 2830 kný rajšiemu .
PFX 2830 Y 1
PFX 2830 p 0 .
SFX 2831 Y 1
SFX 2831 ný rajšom .
PFX 2831 Y 1
PFX 2831 pe 0 .
SFX 2832 Y 1
SFX 2832 ný rajším .
PFX 2832 Y 1
PFX 2832 pe 0 .
SFX 2833 Y 1
SFX 2833 ný rajších .
PFX 2833 Y 1
PFX 2833 pe 0 .
SFX 2834 Y 1
SFX 2834 ný rajšími .
PFX 2834 Y 1
PFX 2834 pe 0 .
SFX 2835 Y 1
SFX 2835 kný rajšie .
PFX 2835 Y 1
PFX 2835 p 0 .
SFX 2836 Y 1
SFX 2836 ný rajšia .
PFX 2836 Y 1
PFX 2836 pe 0 .
SFX 2837 Y 1
SFX 2837 kný rajšej .
PFX 2837 Y 1
PFX 2837 p 0 .
SFX 2838 Y 1
SFX 2838 ný rajšiu .
PFX 2838 Y 1
PFX 2838 pe 0 .
SFX 2839 Y 1
SFX 2839 ný rajšou .
PFX 2839 Y 1
PFX 2839 pe 0 .
SFX 2840 Y 1
SFX 2840 ný ajkrajší .
PFX 2840 Y 1
PFX 2840 pe 0 .
SFX 2841 Y 1
SFX 2841 kný ajkrajšieho .
PFX 2841 Y 1
PFX 2841 p 0 .
SFX 2842 Y 1
SFX 2842 kný ajkrajšiemu .
PFX 2842 Y 1
PFX 2842 p 0 .
SFX 2843 Y 1
SFX 2843 ný ajkrajšom .
PFX 2843 Y 1
PFX 2843 pe 0 .
SFX 2844 Y 1
SFX 2844 ný ajkrajším .
PFX 2844 Y 1
PFX 2844 pe 0 .
SFX 2845 Y 1
SFX 2845 ný ajkrajších .
PFX 2845 Y 1
PFX 2845 pe 0 .
SFX 2846 Y 1
SFX 2846 ný ajkrajšími .
PFX 2846 Y 1
PFX 2846 pe 0 .
SFX 2847 Y 1
SFX 2847 kný ajkrajšie .
PFX 2847 Y 1
PFX 2847 p 0 .
SFX 2848 Y 1
SFX 2848 ný ajkrajšia .
PFX 2848 Y 1
PFX 2848 pe 0 .
SFX 2849 Y 1
SFX 2849 kný ajkrajšej .
PFX 2849 Y 1
PFX 2849 p 0 .
SFX 2850 Y 1
SFX 2850 ný ajkrajšiu .
PFX 2850 Y 1
PFX 2850 pe 0 .
SFX 2851 Y 1
SFX 2851 ný ajkrajšou .
PFX 2851 Y 1
PFX 2851 pe 0 .
SFX 2852 N 1
SFX 2852 alta ált .
SFX 2853 Y 1
SFX 2853 o 0 .
PFX 2853 Y 1
PFX 2853 p pi .
SFX 2854 N 1
SFX 2854 es sa .
SFX 2855 N 1
SFX 2855 es sovi .
SFX 2856 N 1
SFX 2856 es som .
SFX 2857 N 1
SFX 2857 es sy .
SFX 2858 N 1
SFX 2858 es si .
SFX 2859 N 1
SFX 2859 es sov .
SFX 2860 N 1
SFX 2860 es soch .
SFX 2861 N 1
SFX 2861 es sami .
SFX 2862 Y 1
SFX 2862 cť m .
PFX 2862 Y 1
PFX 2862 p peč .
SFX 2863 Y 1
SFX 2863 cť š .
PFX 2863 Y 1
PFX 2863 p peč .
SFX 2864 Y 1
SFX 2864 cť 0 .
PFX 2864 Y 1
PFX 2864 p peč .
SFX 2865 Y 1
SFX 2865 cť me .
PFX 2865 Y 1
PFX 2865 p peč .
SFX 2866 Y 1
SFX 2866 cť te .
PFX 2866 Y 1
PFX 2866 p peč .
SFX 2867 Y 1
SFX 2867 a 0 .
PFX 2867 Y 1
PFX 2867 pi pí .
SFX 2868 N 1
SFX 2868 iča íč .
SFX 2869 N 1
SFX 2869 ece iec .
SFX 2870 Y 1
SFX 2870 a 0 .
PFX 2870 Y 1
PFX 2870 pl pli .
SFX 2871 N 1
SFX 2871 eva iev .
SFX 2872 N 1
SFX 2872 nec ca .
SFX 2873 N 1
SFX 2873 nec cu .
SFX 2874 N 1
SFX 2874 nec ci .
SFX 2875 N 1
SFX 2875 nec com .
SFX 2876 N 1
SFX 2876 nec ce .
SFX 2877 N 1
SFX 2877 nec cov .
SFX 2878 N 1
SFX 2878 nec coch .
SFX 2879 N 1
SFX 2879 nec cami .
SFX 2880 N 1
SFX 2880 e šie .
SFX 2881 Y 1
SFX 2881 e šie .
PFX 2881 Y 1
PFX 2881 0 naj .
SFX 2882 Y 1
SFX 2882 ť me .
PFX 2882 Y 1
PFX 2882 0 po .
SFX 2883 Y 1
SFX 2883 ť te .
PFX 2883 Y 1
PFX 2883 0 po .
SFX 2884 Y 1
SFX 2884 ť jú .
PFX 2884 Y 1
PFX 2884 0 po .
SFX 2885 Y 1
SFX 2885 ť m .
PFX 2885 Y 1
PFX 2885 0 po .
SFX 2886 Y 1
SFX 2886 ť š .
PFX 2886 Y 1
PFX 2886 0 po .
SFX 2887 Y 1
SFX 2887 a 0 .
PFX 2887 Y 1
PFX 2887 po pô .
SFX 2888 N 1
SFX 2888 oma ôm .
SFX 2889 N 1
SFX 2889 le ľa .
SFX 2890 N 1
SFX 2890 le ľu .
SFX 2891 N 1
SFX 2891 en nách .
SFX 2892 N 1
SFX 2892 et ta .
SFX 2893 N 1
SFX 2893 y šie .
SFX 2894 Y 1
SFX 2894 y šie .
PFX 2894 Y 1
PFX 2894 0 naj .
SFX 2895 N 1
SFX 2895 yje ýj .
SFX 2896 N 1
SFX 2896 iedko edšie .
SFX 2897 Y 1
SFX 2897 iedko edšie .
PFX 2897 Y 1
PFX 2897 0 naj .
SFX 2898 N 1
SFX 2898 iptum ípt .
SFX 2899 N 1
SFX 2899 auna áun .
SFX 2900 N 1
SFX 2900 a ejšie .
SFX 2901 Y 1
SFX 2901 a ejšie .
PFX 2901 Y 1
PFX 2901 0 naj .
SFX 2902 N 1
SFX 2902 ľana lian .
SFX 2903 N 1
SFX 2903 ia ov .
SFX 2904 N 1
SFX 2904 ia om .
SFX 2905 N 1
SFX 2905 ia och .
SFX 2906 N 1
SFX 2906 ia mi .
SFX 2907 N 1
SFX 2907 a ce .
SFX 2908 N 1
SFX 2908 a iec .
SFX 2909 N 1
SFX 2909 a com .
SFX 2910 N 1
SFX 2910 a coch .
SFX 2911 N 1
SFX 2911 a cami .
SFX 2912 N 1
SFX 2912 ilba ílb .
SFX 2913 N 1
SFX 2913 oso ôs .
SFX 2914 N 1
SFX 2914 ietor etra .
SFX 2915 N 1
SFX 2915 ietor etru .
SFX 2916 N 1
SFX 2916 ietor etre .
SFX 2917 N 1
SFX 2917 ietor etrom .
SFX 2918 N 1
SFX 2918 ietor etry .
SFX 2919 N 1
SFX 2919 ietor etrov .
SFX 2920 N 1
SFX 2920 ietor etroch .
SFX 2921 N 1
SFX 2921 ietor etrami .
SFX 2922 N 1
SFX 2922 rsia ŕs .
SFX 2923 N 1
SFX 2923 ká iek .
SFX 2924 N 1
SFX 2924 y km .
SFX 2925 N 1
SFX 2925 y kv .
SFX 2926 N 1
SFX 2926 y kch .
SFX 2927 Y 1
SFX 2927 a 0 .
PFX 2927 Y 1
PFX 2927 pu pú .
SFX 2928 N 1
SFX 2928 usa ús .
SFX 2929 N 1
SFX 2929 uto út .
SFX 2930 N 1
SFX 2930 án ane .
SFX 2931 N 1
SFX 2931 boh aboha .
SFX 2932 N 1
SFX 2932 boh ubohu .
SFX 2933 Y 1
SFX 2933 h že .
PFX 2933 Y 1
PFX 2933 pán pane .
SFX 2934 N 1
SFX 2934 boh ombohom .
SFX 2935 N 1
SFX 2935 mo em .
SFX 2936 N 1
SFX 2936 yta ýt .
SFX 2937 Y 1
SFX 2937 a 0 .
PFX 2937 Y 1
PFX 2937 ra rá .
SFX 2938 N 1
SFX 2938 az áz .
SFX 2939 Y 1
SFX 2939 a 0 .
PFX 2939 Y 1
PFX 2939 r ri .
SFX 2940 Y 1
SFX 2940 cť m .
PFX 2940 Y 1
PFX 2940 r reč .
SFX 2941 Y 1
SFX 2941 cť š .
PFX 2941 Y 1
PFX 2941 r reč .
SFX 2942 Y 1
SFX 2942 cť 0 .
PFX 2942 Y 1
PFX 2942 r reč .
SFX 2943 Y 1
SFX 2943 cť me .
PFX 2943 Y 1
PFX 2943 r reč .
SFX 2944 Y 1
SFX 2944 cť te .
PFX 2944 Y 1
PFX 2944 r reč .
SFX 2945 Y 1
SFX 2945 ť 0 .
PFX 2945 Y 1
PFX 2945 ri r .
SFX 2946 Y 1
SFX 2946 ť me .
PFX 2946 Y 1
PFX 2946 ri r .
SFX 2947 Y 1
SFX 2947 ť te .
PFX 2947 Y 1
PFX 2947 ri r .
SFX 2948 Y 1
SFX 2948 dko šie .
PFX 2948 Y 1
PFX 2948 r r .
SFX 2949 Y 1
SFX 2949 dko šie .
PFX 2949 Y 1
PFX 2949 r najr .
SFX 2950 Y 1
SFX 2950 ky ší .
PFX 2950 Y 1
PFX 2950 ri r .
SFX 2951 Y 1
SFX 2951 dky šieho .
PFX 2951 Y 1
PFX 2951 r r .
SFX 2952 Y 1
SFX 2952 dky šiemu .
PFX 2952 Y 1
PFX 2952 r r .
SFX 2953 Y 1
SFX 2953 ky šom .
PFX 2953 Y 1
PFX 2953 ri r .
SFX 2954 Y 1
SFX 2954 ky ším .
PFX 2954 Y 1
PFX 2954 ri r .
SFX 2955 Y 1
SFX 2955 ky ších .
PFX 2955 Y 1
PFX 2955 ri r .
SFX 2956 Y 1
SFX 2956 ky šími .
PFX 2956 Y 1
PFX 2956 ri r .
SFX 2957 Y 1
SFX 2957 dky šie .
PFX 2957 Y 1
PFX 2957 r r .
SFX 2958 Y 1
SFX 2958 ky šia .
PFX 2958 Y 1
PFX 2958 ri r .
SFX 2959 Y 1
SFX 2959 ky šej .
PFX 2959 Y 1
PFX 2959 ri r .
SFX 2960 Y 1
SFX 2960 ky šiu .
PFX 2960 Y 1
PFX 2960 ri r .
SFX 2961 Y 1
SFX 2961 ky šou .
PFX 2961 Y 1
PFX 2961 ri r .
SFX 2962 Y 1
SFX 2962 ky ší .
PFX 2962 Y 1
PFX 2962 ri najr .
SFX 2963 Y 1
SFX 2963 dky šieho .
PFX 2963 Y 1
PFX 2963 r najr .
SFX 2964 Y 1
SFX 2964 dky šiemu .
PFX 2964 Y 1
PFX 2964 r najr .
SFX 2965 Y 1
SFX 2965 ky šom .
PFX 2965 Y 1
PFX 2965 ri najr .
SFX 2966 Y 1
SFX 2966 ky ším .
PFX 2966 Y 1
PFX 2966 ri najr .
SFX 2967 Y 1
SFX 2967 ky ších .
PFX 2967 Y 1
PFX 2967 ri najr .
SFX 2968 Y 1
SFX 2968 ky šími .
PFX 2968 Y 1
PFX 2968 ri najr .
SFX 2969 Y 1
SFX 2969 dky šie .
PFX 2969 Y 1
PFX 2969 r najr .
SFX 2970 Y 1
SFX 2970 ky šia .
PFX 2970 Y 1
PFX 2970 ri najr .
SFX 2971 Y 1
SFX 2971 ky šej .
PFX 2971 Y 1
PFX 2971 ri najr .
SFX 2972 Y 1
SFX 2972 ky šiu .
PFX 2972 Y 1
PFX 2972 ri najr .
SFX 2973 Y 1
SFX 2973 ky šou .
PFX 2973 Y 1
PFX 2973 ri najr .
SFX 2974 N 1
SFX 2974 allo áll .
SFX 2975 N 1
SFX 2975 ata iat .
SFX 2976 Y 1
SFX 2976 a 0 .
PFX 2976 Y 1
PFX 2976 ru rú .
SFX 2977 Y 1
SFX 2977 ásť astieme .
PFX 2977 Y 1
PFX 2977 0 po .
SFX 2978 Y 1
SFX 2978 ásť astiete .
PFX 2978 Y 1
PFX 2978 0 po .
SFX 2979 Y 1
SFX 2979 ásť astú .
